Missouri, session 2026, HB2355.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 208, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 208.270, to read as follows:
208.270. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Food is
Medicine Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Medically tailored groceries", a selection of groceries, including but not
limited to fruits, vegetables, grains, beans, lean proteins, or dairy, that is prescribed by a
registered dietitian or qualified clinical team for individuals who are able to prepare
food;
(2) "Medically tailored meals", meals used to meet the specific dietary needs of
individuals living with one or more chronic conditions or diet-related conditions. Such
meals are prescribed by a registered dietitian or qualified clinical team and home-
delivered for individuals who are not able to prepare food on their own;
(3) "Produce prescriptions", the prescription of fruits, vegetables, or other
healthy foods with no added fats, sugars, or salts to at-risk patients by a registered
dietitian or qualified clinical team, typically in the form of coupons or vouchers for local
farmers' markets, grocery stores, or mobile markets.
3. The department of social services shall apply to the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services of the federal Department of Health and Human Services for a
Section 1115 demonstration waiver to implement the "Food is Medicine" program for
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2355 2
the purpose of providing nutritional support through the MO HealthNet program. The
food is medicine program shall be designed to improve health outcomes for MO
HealthNet participants with nutrition-related chronic diseases through nutrition
services and to reduce the need for medical care for those participants.
4. Nutrition services covered under this program may include, but shall not be
limited to, the following:
(1) Case management;
(2) Nutrition counseling; and
(3) Food provisions prescribed by a registered dietitian or qualified clinical
team, including:
(a) Medically tailored groceries;
(b) Medically tailored meals; and
(c) Produce prescriptions.
5. Whenever feasible, the MO HealthNet division shall prioritize the inclusion of
community-based organizations and local growers to support the purchase of locally
grown food in nutrition prescriptions.
6. The department of social services shall promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2025, shall be invalid and void.
✔